District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-616.03

Procedures and appeals.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1603, 25 DCR 5740
May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-128, § 2(c), 37 DCR 2099
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(r), 45 DCR 2464

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-617.3.
1973 Ed., § 1-346.3.

Emergency Legislation

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-616.01.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-603.01.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of § 101(r) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-616.01.

Applicability of § 101(r) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.